North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4.1 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4.1-35 Chemigation Regulation

Source:

S.L. 2017, sb2027, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-35-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Chemigation” means any process by which chemicals, including pesticides and fertilizers, are applied to land or crops through an irrigation system.

“Commissioner” means the agriculture commissioner and includes any employee or agent designated by the commissioner.

“Fertilizer” means any fertilizer as defined by section 4.1-40-01.

“Pesticide” means that term defined in section 4.1-33-01.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 488, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

4.1-35-02.
Compliance with rules.

Farm irrigation systems used for chemigation which are designed, constructed, and operated in compliance with rules adopted under this chapter are considered to be in compliance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-35-03.
Rules — Standards for chemigation, installation, maintenance, and modifications.

The commissioner shall adopt rules regulating chemigation through irrigation systems in this state to minimize the possibility of chemical, pesticide, fertilizer, or other contamination of irrigation water supply and other rules as necessary to implement this chapter. The commissioner may establish by rule standards for application of pesticides and fertilizers through irrigation systems; for installation and maintenance of all equipment and devices used for chemigation purposes; modifications or changes in design, technology, or irrigation practices; or other purposes relating to the use or placement of equipment or devices. The commissioner may adopt rules requiring periodic calibration and inspection of equipment and system operation during periods of chemigation.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

4.1-35-04.
Inspections — Assistance of department of water resources.

The department of water resources shall cooperate with the commissioner in the inspection of any irrigation system using chemigation. The department shall inform the commissioner of any violation of this chapter which is discovered in the course of the department’s regular inspections of irrigation systems using chemigation.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 488, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

4.1-35-05.
Enforcement.

The commissioner shall enforce this chapter and any rules adopted under this chapter.

The commissioner may seek an injunction in the district court in the county in which a violation occurs or may issue a cease and desist order to any person for any alleged violation of this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner and the department of water resources may enter upon any public or private premises at reasonable times in order to:

Have access for the purpose of inspecting any equipment subject to this chapter and the premises on which the equipment is stored or used.

Inspect or sample lands actually, or reported to be, exposed to pesticides or fertilizers through chemigation.

Inspect storage or disposal areas.

Inspect or investigate complaints of injury to humans or animals.

Sample pesticides and fertilizers and pesticide or fertilizer mixes being applied or to be applied.

Observe the use and application of a pesticide or fertilizer through chemigation.

Have access for the purpose of inspecting a premise or other place where equipment or devices used for chemigation are held for distribution, sale, or use.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 4, effective July 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 488, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

4.1-35-06.
Penalties.

Any person who violates a provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

When construing and enforcing the provisions of this chapter or any rules adopted under this chapter, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, or other person acting for or employed by any person must in every case also be deemed to be the act, omission, or failure of such person as well as that of the person employed.

Any person found to have violated a provision of this chapter or rule adopted under this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars for each violation. The civil penalty may be imposed by a court in a civil proceeding or by the commissioner through an administrative hearing under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 67, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.